Alabama, session 2026rs, SB335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) BOARD. The State Board of Education.
(2) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Education.
(3) ENDORSEMENT. The American History and Civics Seal
of Excellence Endorsement.
(4) INITIATIVE. The American History and Civics
Excellence Initiative.
(5) TEACHER. A high school teacher who holds a valid
Alabama Teacher Certificate issued by the department.
(b)(1) The American History and Civics Excellence
Initiative is created within the department. The initiative
shall consist of an online course of study that takes a
minimum of 50 educational hours to complete.
(2) The course of study shall address topics,
including, but not limited to, the following:
a. The philosophical underpinnings of the American
Republic and the root foundation of American exceptionalism.
b. The success of the United States and the success or
failure of other nations' governing philosophies to evaluate
their past, present, and likely future effects.
c. The value of civic pride and regular participation
by citizens in government.
d. The rights and responsibilities of citizens,
Page 2

d. The rights and responsibilities of citizens,
SB335 INTRODUCED
including the process of advocating properly with government
officials.
(c) The State Superintendent of Education shall
appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate, a program
director within the department. The program director shall
direct and manage the initiative in compliance with this
section.
(d)(1) The State Superintendent of Education shall
develop, and the State Board of Education shall approve, the
American History and Civics Seal of Excellence Endorsement
subject to the requirements of this section.
(2) A teacher who completes the online course of study
is eligible for the endorsement. Upon successful completion of
the course of study, the teacher may submit an application to
the program director to add the American History and Civics
Seal of Excellence Endorsement to his or her valid Alabama
Teacher Certification.
(3) Each teacher who successfully completes the course
of study and receives the endorsement may also submit an
application to the program director for a one-time stipend of
three thousand dollars ($3,000). The program director shall
review each application, confirm that the teacher has
completed the course of study and received the endorsement,
and, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, facilitate
the awarding of the stipend.
(4) Any monies appropriated shall be budgeted and
allotted pursuant to the Budget Management Act in accordance
with Article 4, commencing with Section 41-4-80 of Chapter 4
Page 3

with Article 4, commencing with Section 41-4-80 of Chapter 4
SB335 INTRODUCED
of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975, and only in the amounts
provided by the Legislature in the general appropriations act
or other appropriations act.
(e)(1) The board shall oversee the initiative and adopt
rules to implement and administer this section.
(2) The board shall develop separate application forms
that a teacher must complete to: (i) receive the endorsement;
and (ii) receive the stipend.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4